Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-689
Taxes; delinquent; lien; collection.

If any taxes and interest and penalties due on such taxes have not been paid on July 1 following the levy thereof, the total amount shall be a lien in favor of the State of Nebraska upon all money and credits belonging to the car line companies until the liability therefor is satisfied or otherwise released or discharged. The Tax Commissioner or his or her designated agent may collect such total amount by issuing a distress warrant and making levy upon all money and credits belonging to such car line companies. Such lien shall be filed and enforced pursuant to the Uniform State Tax Lien Registration and Enforcement Act.

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 74;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 214;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 83;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 40.

Uniform State Tax Lien Registration and Enforcement Act, see section 77-3901.